District of Columbia statutes.
2-1209.08

First source employment agreement required.

Tenant businesses chosen for occupancy in business incubators shall execute a first source employment agreement with the District government pursuant to § 2-219.03.

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-71, § 9, 32 DCR 6334
1981 Ed., § 1-2238.